District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-301.05b

Privatization contracts and procedures requirements.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 105b
as added Mar. 19, 1994, D.C. Law 10-79, § 2(b), 40 DCR 8696
Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 501(a), 43 DCR 5
Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-274, § 3, 48 DCR 1654
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 1192(a), 51 DCR 8441
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1181.5b.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 701 of the Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 10-253, March 23, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1652).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2 through 4 of the Department of Corrections Privatization Facilitation Temporary Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-149, July 20, 1996, law notification 43 DCR 4354).

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 through 4 of the District Employee Protection Temporary Act of 2009 (D.C. Law 17-386, March 31, 2009, law notification 56 DCR 3452).

Emergency Legislation

Fleet Management Services of the Metropolitan Police Department: For temporary provisions concerning the privatization of Fleet Management Services in the Metropolitan Police Department, see § 701 of the Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-389, December 29, 1994, 42 DCR 197).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Tenant Representative Services Facilitation Emergency Exemption Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-3, February 24, 1997, 44 DCR 1605).
For temporary exemption from the requirements of the District of Columbia Procurement Practices Act of 1985 privatization initiatives of the Department of Corrections to contract-out food, medical, inmate finance, and canteen services, and time and attendance responsibilities, and to contract for the sale and lease-back of the Correctional Treatment Facility, see §§ 2-4 of the Department of Corrections Privatization Facilitation Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-251, April 15, 1996, 43 DCR 2135), §§ 2-4 of the Department of Corrections Privatization Facilitation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-305, July 24, 1996, 43 DCR 4200), and §§ 2-4 of the Department of Corrections Privatization Facilitation Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-29, March 18, 1997, 44 DCR 1897).
For temporary repeal of the Department of Corrections Procurement and Privatization Exemption Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-220, February 23, 1996, 43 DCR 1176), see § 5 of the Department of Corrections Privatization Facilitation Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-29, March 18, 1997, 44 DCR 1897).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1192(a) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1192(a) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of District Employee Protection Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-645, January 8, 2009, 56 DCR 898).

Short Title

Short title of subtitle R of title I of Law 15-205: Section 1191 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle R of title I of the act may be cited as District of Columbia Auditor Statutory Audit Requirements Amendment Act of 2004.

Editor's Notes

Privatization of Government Services Task Force: D.C. Law 10-240 provided that the Mayor shall appoint a Privatization of Government Services Task Force that will examine the potential benefits of privatizing certain government services and programs.